Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2441
Participant; duties; resale prohibited.

(1) A participant shall comply with all applicable provisions of state and federal law relating to the storage, distribution, and dispensing of donated immunosuppressant drugs and shall inspect all such drugs prior to dispensing to determine if the drugs are adulterated or misbranded as defined in section 71-2461 or 71-2470 or if the drugs bear an expiration date prior to the date of dispensing. Such drugs shall only be dispensed pursuant to a prescription issued by a prescribing practitioner. Such drugs may be distributed to another participant for dispensing.

(2) Immunosuppressant drugs donated under the program shall not be resold.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 47;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 77.